Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1840.01
State or political subdivision; failure to act; effect.

Nothing in the Nebraska Crime Victim's Reparations Act or sections 81-1843 to 81-1851 requiring an act by the state or a political subdivision is deemed to create any liability if the state or political subdivision fails to act as required under the Nebraska Crime Victim's Reparations Act or such sections. Such failure to act also shall not invalidate any legal process or proceeding.

Laws 2004, LB 270, § 7.